dev/ortho/lat-cyr.twol
Alphabet

 !ء
 !ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۆ ۋ ې ى ي  ٸ ٶ ٷ ٵ

 !% ء

 ! ء ا ە ه ې ب ت پ ج چ خ ح د ر ز ژ س ش ع ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۋ ى ي ۆ









 A:А
 B:Б
 D:Д
 E:Е
 F:Ф
 G:Г
 Ğ:Ғ
 H:Ҳ
 I:И
 J:Ж
 K:К
 L:Л
 M:М
 N:Н
 O:О
 Ö:Ў
 P:П
 R:Р
 S:С
 T:Т
 U:У
 V:В
 X:Х
 Y:Й
 Z:З
 Ş:Ш
 Ç:Ч
 Q:Қ
 C:Ц

  a:а
  b:б
  d:д
  e:е
  e:э
  f:ф
  g:г
  ğ:ғ
  h:ҳ
  i:и
  j:ж
  k:к
  l:л
  m:м
  n:н
  o:о
  ö:ў
  p:п
  r:р
  s:с
  t:т
  c:ц
  u:у
  v:в
  x:х
  y:й
  z:з
  ş:ш
  ç:ч
  q:қ

  ʻ:ъ

%{й%}:й
%{e%}:э
%{c%}:ц
%{s%}:ц
%{ь%}:ь
%{h%}:ҳ

 ;


Sets

Vow = a e i o u ;

Yot = я ё ю е ;

Cons = b d f g ğ h j k l m n p r s t v x y z ş ç q c ;

Rules

"Yot letters"
Vx:Vy <=> y: _ ;
     where Vx in ( a o u e )
           Vy in ( я ё ю е )
     matched ;

"And delete y"
y:0 <=> _ :Yot ;

"э at beginning of word"
e:э <=> .#. _ ;

"е not at beginning of word"
e:е <=> [ Cons: - y: ] _ ;
